apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 13952
	Sdefs: 89
	Paradigms: 289

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜÚàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz0123456789</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="alpha" /> 
		<sdef n="acr" /> 
		<sdef n="predet" /> 
		<sdef n="detnt" /> 
		<sdef n="top" /> 
		<sdef n="ant" /> 
		<sdef n="al" /> 
		<sdef n="cog" /> 
		<sdef n="atn" /> 
		<sdef n="enc" /> 
		<sdef n="pro" /> 
		<sdef n="tn" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="np" /> 
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="adv" /> 
		<sdef n="preadv" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" /> 
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="rel" /> 
		<sdef n="nn" /> 
		<sdef n="an" /> 
		<sdef n="aa" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="itg" /> 
		<sdef n="det" /> 
		<sdef n="dem" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="vbser" /> 
		<sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="vbmod" /> 
		<sdef n="inf" /> 
		<sdef n="ger" /> 
		<sdef n="pp" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="pii" /> 
		<sdef n="ifi" /> 
		<sdef n="fti" /> 
		<sdef n="cni" /> 
		<sdef n="prs" /> 
		<sdef n="pis" /> 
		<sdef n="fts" /> 
		<sdef n="imp" /> 
		<sdef n="pos" /> 
		<sdef n="sp" /> 
		<sdef n="ref" /> 
		<sdef n="sup" /> 
		<sdef n="ord" /> 
		<sdef n="qnt" /> 
		<sdef n="num" /> 
		<sdef n="pron" /> 
		<sdef n="ij" /> 
		<sdef n="sent" /> 
		<sdef n="cm" /> 
		<sdef n="lpar" /> 
		<sdef n="rpar" /> 
		<sdef n="web" /> 
		<sdef n="apos" /> 
		<sdef n="percent" /> 
		<sdef n="guio" /> 
		<sdef n="past" /> 
		<sdef n="sep" /> 
		<sdef n="sint" /> 
		<sdef n="email" /> 
		<sdef n="obj" /> 
		<sdef n="subj" /> 
		<sdef n="subs" /> 
		<sdef n="pprs" /> 
		<sdef n="url" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="vbdo" /> 
		<sdef n="comp" /> 
		<sdef n="pres" /> 
		<sdef n="vaux" /> 
		<sdef n="sym" /> 
		<sdef n="ND" /> 
		<sdef n="GD" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>

<!-- Formatting of this dix:
     apertium-dixtools cat -align -alignpardef 30 60 apertium-eo-en.en.dix  
-->

<pardef n="ouml">
<e>                           <p><l>ö</l>                   <r>ö</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>oe</l>                  <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="uuml">
<e>                           <p><l>ü</l>                   <r>ü</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ue</l>                  <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>




   
<pardef n="o_ou">
<e>                           <p><l>ou</l>                  <r>ou</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>o</l>                   <r>ou</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="z_s">
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r>s</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>z</l>                   <r>s</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e_ae">
<e>                           <p><l>ae</l>                  <r>ae</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>e</l>                   <r>ae</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e_oe">
<e>                           <p><l>oe</l>                  <r>oe</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>e</l>                   <r>oe</r></p></e>
</pardef>








  
<pardef n="guionet">
<e>                           <p><l>-</l>                   <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
<e>                           <p><l>,</l>                   <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aposchar">
<e>                           <i>'</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
<e>                           <par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l> <r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
<e>                           <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Years -->
<pardef n="years">
<e>                           <!--      <i>the<b/></i> -->
<re>[0-9]0</re><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <!--      <i>the<b/></i> -->
<re>[0-9][0-9]0</re><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <!--      <i>the<b/></i> -->
<re>[0-9][0-9][0-9]0</re><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="time">
<e>                           <re>[0-9]+[.:][0-5][0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>[0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals">
<e>                           <re>([0-9]*)?([1-9])?</re><p><l>1st</l><r>1st<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>([0-9]*)?</re><p><l>2nd</l><r>2nd<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>([0-9]*)?</re><p><l>3rd</l><r>3rd<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>([0-9]*)?</re><p><l>4th</l><r>4th<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <re>([0-9]*)?</re><p><l>th</l><r>th<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="proper_names">
<e>                           <re>(St|Sir|Lord|Rt Hon|Mr|Miss|Ms|Mrs|Dr|Don).? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="separa">
<e>                           <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l>   <r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
    
<pardef n="paresq">
<e>                           <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l>     <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="pardret">
<e>                           <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l>     <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="emails">
<e>                           <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="urls">
<e>                           <re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="expensive__adj">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="long/__adj">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>er</l>                  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>est</l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="happ/y__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                   <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ier</l>                 <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>iest</l>                <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sly/__adj">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>er</l>                  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>est</l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="sh/y__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                   <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ier</l>                 <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>iest</l>                <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>yer</l>                 <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>yest</l>                <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="clear">                <i>clear</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="digital">              <i>digital</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dumb">                 <i>dumb</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="easy">                 <i>eas</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gray">                 <i>gray</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="great">                <i>great</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grey">                 <i>grey</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="healthy">              <i>health</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="liable">               <i>liable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="light">                <i>light</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="north">                <i>north</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pretty">               <i>prett</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pure">                 <i>pure</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sexual">               <i>sexual</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="shy">                  <i>sh</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="soft">                 <i>soft</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ugly">                 <i>ugl</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="proper_names"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="years"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="time"/></e>
<e lm="anaemia">              <i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="anaesthesia">          <i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="answerable">           <i>answerable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blunt">                <i>blunt</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="diacritic">            <i>diacritic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="foetus">               <i>f</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>tus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="funky">                <i>funk</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fuzzy">                <i>fuzz</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impractical">          <i>impractical</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lazy">                 <i>laz</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="needy">                <i>need</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="on-line">              <i>on-line</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="organisational">       <i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="organiser">            <i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="reorganisation">       <i>reorgani</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="salty">                <i>salt</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="scaly">                <i>scal</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sparse">               <i>sparse</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stray">                <i>stray</i><par n="sly/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sunny">                <i>sunn</i><par n="happ/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unkind">               <i>unkind</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wry">                  <i>wr</i><par n="sh/y__adj"/></e>
<e>                           <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                           <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen">               <i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jürgen Trumpf">        <i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pöttering">            <i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tönis">                <i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e i=""><par n="paresq"/></e>
<e i=""><par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>                           <par n="urls"/></e>
